Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
432 [OLD]

TITLE
INSURANCE AND TITLE INSURERS

REPEALED. L 1987, c 347, §1.

Cross References

For present provisions, see chapter 431, article 20.

For disposition of repealed provisions, see also Insurance
Law Revision reference table at the end of chapter 435.

CHAPTER
432

BENEFIT
SOCIETIES

ARTICLE 1.
MUTUAL BENEFIT SOCIETIES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

432:1-101 Scope; exemptions

432:1-101.5 Disclosure of health care coverage
and benefits

432:1-101.6 Policies relating to domestic abuse
cases

432:1-102 Applicability of other laws

432:1-103 Applicability of this article to
existing

societies and union mutual benefit
societies

432:1-104 Definitions

432:1-104.5 Bona fide trade associations

432:1-105 Penalty

432:1-106 Repealed

432:1-107 Federal law compliance

432:1-107.5 Prohibition on rescissions of
coverage

432:1-108 Fees

Part II. Organization

432:1-201 Incorporation by charter

432:1-202 Constitution and bylaws; officers;
government

of society

432:1-203 Actions or proceedings

432:1-204 Foreign societies

Part III. Authority to Offer Benefits

432:1-301 Registration with commissioner:
certificate of

registration and certificate of
authority

432:1-302 Commissioner refusal to authorize
certificate or

solicitation; appeal to circuit court

432:1-303 Authority to offer death, sick,
disability, or

other benefits; conditions

432:1-304 Authority to offer death, sick,
disability, or

other benefits; special deposit and
control of

certain funds

432:1-305 Authority to offer death, sick,
disability, or

other benefits; restrictions on use
of funds

432:1-306 Authority to offer death, sick,
disability, or

other benefits; deposit or bond

432:1-307 Repealed

432:1-308 Suspension, revocation, or denial of certificate of authority

Part IV. Financial and Reporting
Requirements

432:1-401 Repealed

432:1-402 Investments of certain mutual benefit
societies

432:1-403 Nonprofit medical, hospital indemnity

associations; tax exemption

432:1-404 Annual exhibits

432:1-405 Annual audit

432:1-406 Definitions

432:1-407 Protection against insolvency

432:1-408 Uncovered expenditures insolvency
deposit

432:1-409 Rehabilitation, liquidation, or
conservation

of mutual benefit societies

432:1-410 Reserve credit for reinsurance

Part V. Examination Powers and
Receivership

432:1-501 Examination by commissioner,
assistance of

other officers

432:1-502 Summary orders and supervision

432:1-503 Closing of doors without notice

Part VI. Required Provisions and Benefits

432:1-601 Contract limitations for handicapped
children

and children with intellectual
disabilities

432:1-601.5 Coverage for telehealth

432:1-604 In vitro fertilization procedure
coverage

432:1-602 Newborn children coverage

432:1-602.5 Coverage for child health supervision
services

432:1-602.6 Newborn adoptee; coverage

432:1-603 Reimbursement for psychological
services

432:1-604 In vitro fertilization procedure
coverage

432:1-604.5 Contraceptive services

432:1-605 Mammogram screening

432:1-605.5 Mammograms; referral not required

432:1-606 Qualified medical child support order

432:1-607 Genetic information nondiscrimination
in health

insurance coverage

432:1-607.3 Nondiscrimination on the basis of actual gender

identity or perceived gender identity; coverage

for services

432:1-608 Hospice care coverage

432:1-609 Medical foods and low-protein
modified food

products; treatment of inborn error
of

metabolism; notice

432:1-610 Federally funded programs; exemption

432:1-611 Reimbursement for services of advanced

practice registered nurses

432:1-612 Diabetes coverage

432:1-613 Orthodontic services for orofacial
anomalies;

benefits and coverage; notice

432:1-614 Autism benefits and coverage; notice;
definitions

432:1-615 Primary care provider; advanced
practice

registered nurse

432:1-616 Cancer treatment

432:1-617 Colon cancer screening coverage

432:1-618 Human immunodeficiency virus and acquired

immunodeficiency syndrome screening coverage

432:1-620 Formulary; accessibility requirements

ARTICLE 2.
FRATERNAL BENEFIT SOCIETIES

Part I. Structure and Purpose

432:2-101 Scope of article

432:2-102 Applicability of other laws

432:2-103 Definitions

432:2-103.5 Policies relating to domestic abuse
cases

432:2-104 Fraternal benefit societies

432:2-105 Lodge system

432:2-106 Representative form of government

432:2-107 Purposes and powers

432:2-108 Fees

Part II. Membership

432:2-201 Qualifications for membership

432:2-202 Location of office, meetings,
communications

to members, grievance procedures

432:2-203 No personal liability

432:2-204 Waiver

Part III. Governance

432:2-301 Organization

432:2-302 Amendments to laws

432:2-303 Institutions

432:2-304 Reinsurance

432:2-305 Consolidations and mergers

432:2-306 Conversion of fraternal benefit
society into

mutual life insurance company

Part IV. Contractual Benefits

432:2-401 Benefits

432:2-402 Beneficiaries

432:2-403 Benefits not attachable

432:2-404 The benefit contract

432:2-404.5 Genetic information nondiscrimination
in health

insurance coverage

432:2-405 Nonforfeiture benefits, cash
surrender values,

certificate loans and other options

432:2-406 Mammogram coverage required; referral
not

required

432:2-410 Primary care provider; advanced
practice

registered nurse

Part V. Financial

432:2-501 Investments

432:2-502 Funds

432:2-503 Taxation

Part VI. Regulation

432:2-601 Valuations

432:2-602 Reports

432:2-603 Annual license

432:2-604 Examination of societies; no adverse

publications

432:2-605 Foreign or alien society; admission

432:2-606 Injunction, liquidation, receivership
of

domestic society

432:2-607 Suspension, revocation or refusal of
license

of foreign or alien society

432:2-608 Injunction

432:2-609 Licensing of producers

432:2-610 Unfair methods of competition and
unfair and

deceptive acts and practices

432:2-611 Federal law compliance

Part VII. Miscellaneous

432:2-701 Service of process

432:2-702 Review

432:2-703 Penalties

432:2-704 Exemption of certain societies

432:2-705 Severability

Cross References

Conformance to federal law, see §431:2-201.5.

Health care provider network adequacy, see chapter 432F.

Health insurance rate regulation, see chapter 431, article
14F.

Health maintenance organization act, see chapter 432D.

Medicaid-related mandates, see chapter 431L.

Prescription drug benefits, see chapter 431R.

Prescription drugs; mail order opt out option, see §87A-16.3.

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied only to insurers, and not mutual
benefit societies or health maintenance organizations. Att. Gen. Op. 97-5.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next